Indiana, session 2026, SB266.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 8-1-2-42.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 42.2. (a) This section
applies to a base rate proceeding that is:
(1) filed with; or
(2) pending before;
the commission after December 31, 2025, for an increase in an
electricity supplier's basic rates and charges for electric utility
service.
(b) As used in this section, "average monthly residential bill",
with respect to an electricity supplier, means the average total
monthly charges billed to a customer receiving electric utility
service under the electricity supplier's standard residential tariff.
The term includes the following charges:
(1) Fixed service charges.
(2) Energy charges based on the amount of electricity
provided to or consumed by the customer during the billing
2026 IN 266—LS 6879/DI 101


cycle.
(3) Additional charges or credits, including any applicable
rate adjustment mechanisms approved by the commission.
(4) Taxes.
(c) As used in this section, "electric utility service" means
electric service that is provided at retail to customers.
(d) As used in this section, "electricity supplier" means a
person, however organized, that:
(1) provides electric utility service in Indiana; and
(2) is under the jurisdiction of the commission for the
approval of rates and charges.
(e) As used in this section, "relevant period" means the period
that:
(1) includes the last month of an electricity supplier's twelve
(12) month test period used in a proceeding described in
subsection (a); and
(2) extends back through the period beginning with the first
full month following the last order issued by the commission
in which the electricity supplier's basic rates and charges
were approved.
(f) As used in this section, "representative low income
customer", with respect to an electricity supplier, refers to a four
(4) person household that:
(1) receives electric utility service under the electricity
supplier's standard residential tariff;
(2) consumes an average of one thousand (1,000) kilowatt
hours of electricity per month; and
(3) has a household income equal to that of the upper limit
that would qualify the household for assistance from a home
energy assistance program administered under IC 4-4-33
based on the income guidelines in effect for that program as
of the end of the electricity supplier's twelve (12) month test
period used in a proceeding described in subsection (a).
(g) The commission shall do the following before issuing a final
order in a proceeding subject to this section:
(1) In determining whether the requested increase in the
electricity supplier's basic rates and charges is consistent with
the provision of electric utility service with the attribute of
affordability, as set forth in section 0.6(2) of this chapter, the
commission shall consider whether the requested increase
would result, upon full implementation, in an average
monthly residential bill that would represent more than six
2026 IN 266—LS 6879/DI 101


percent (6%) of a representative low income customer's
monthly income. In considering the impact on representative
low income customers of the requested increase in the
electricity supplier's basic rates and charges, the commission
shall give due regard to the need to avoid or minimize
cross-class subsidies.
(2) In determining whether the requested increase in the
electricity supplier's basic rates and charges supports the
provision of reliable electric utility service, as set forth in
section 0.6(1) of this chapter, at economical rates for the
electricity supplier's existing and future Indiana customers,
the commission shall consider and compare the following:
(A) The total amount of the electricity supplier's actual
return for the relevant period that was:
(i) distributed to shareholders in the form of dividends;
or
(ii) reinvested by the electricity supplier in its own stock.
(B) The sum of:
(i) the total amount of the electricity supplier's actual
return for the relevant period that was invested in
infrastructure or improvements to the electricity
supplier's system and that has not been recovered
through the electricity supplier's rates, through an
adjustable rate mechanism or otherwise, during the
relevant period; plus
(ii) the amount of capital investments that are known
and measurable for ratemaking purposes and that are
associated with a set of discrete and identifiable capital
spending projects that will be placed in service within a
reasonable time after the end of the electricity supplier's
twelve (12) month test period in the proceeding, to the
extent those investments have not already been
recovered through the electricity supplier's rates.
(3) Regardless of whether a public hearing is otherwise
required or requested under section 61 of this chapter, the
commission shall hold at least two (2) public hearings in the
electricity supplier's service area, including at least one (1)
public hearing in one (1) of the following, as determined by
the commission:
(A) The largest municipality located within the electricity
supplier's service area.
(B) The municipality containing the largest number of
2026 IN 266—LS 6879/DI 101


customers served by the electricity supplier.
(C) The county containing the largest number of customers
served by the electricity supplier.
(h) In the commission's final order issued in a proceeding
subject to this section, the commission shall include:
(1) the commission's findings with respect to the
considerations described in subsection (g)(1) and (g)(2); and
(2) a discussion of how the commission took those findings
into account in reaching the decisions set forth in the order.
SECTION 2. IC 8-1-2-61, AS AMENDED BY P.L.87-2024,
SECTION 15, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 61. (a) Any public utility
may make complaint as to any matter affecting its own rates or service.
The petition or complaint must include a statement as to whether the
utility, if a not-for-profit water utility or municipal utility, has any
outstanding indebtedness to the federal government. The public utility
shall publish a notice of the filing of such petition or complaint in a
newspaper of general circulation published in any county in which the
public utility renders service. An order affecting rates or service may
be entered by the commission without a formal public hearing, if:
(1) the utility is a not-for-profit water utility or a municipal utility;
and
(2) the utility has obtained written consent to obtain an order
affecting its rates from the commission without a formal hearing
from any agency of the federal government with which the utility
has outstanding evidence of indebtedness to the federal
government.
The commission may, however, on its own motion require a formal
public hearing, and shall, upon a motion filed by the utility consumer
counselor, by any public or municipal corporation, or by ten (10)
individuals, firms, corporations, limited liability companies, or
associations, or ten (10) complainants of all or any of these classes,
hold a formal public hearing with respect to any such petition or
complaint.
(b) Subject to section 42.2(g)(3) of this chapter, in any general
rate proceeding under subsection (a) which requires a public hearing
and in which an increase in revenues is sought which exceeds the sum
of two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000), the
commission shall conduct at least one (1) public hearing in one (1) of
the following, as determined by the commission:
(1) The largest municipality located within the utility's service
area.
2026 IN 266—LS 6879/DI 101


(2) The municipality containing the largest number of customers
served by the utility.
(3) The county containing the largest number of customers served
by the utility.
(c) In a proceeding brought by an energy utility (as defined in
IC 8-1-2.5-2) under this section, the commission may approve:
(1) time-varying price structures and tariffs; or
(2) other alternative pricing structures and tariffs;
for retail energy service (as defined in IC 8-1-2.5-3), such as
time-of-use or off-peak pricing, critical peak pricing, variable peak
pricing, and real-time pricing.
SECTION 3. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 266—LS 6879/DI 101